New Jersey, session 221, A2802.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. a.  The Commissioner of Human Services shall apply for such State plan amendments or waivers as may be necessary to secure federal financial participation for State Medicaid expenditures under the federal Medicaid program for the purpose of establishing additional graduate medical education slots focused on behavioral health care. b.   Contingent on approval of State plan amendments or waivers applied for pursuant to subsection a. of this section, the Commissioner of Human Services and the Secretary of Higher Education shall establish a process for new and existing graduate medical education programs to request and use Medicaid funds to establish additional graduate medical education program slots focused on behavioral health care. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.